Illinois, session 104th, SB1515.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Attorney General Act is amended by adding 5Section 6.7 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 205/6.7 new)7    Sec. 6.7. Office for Missing and Murdered Black Women and 8Girls.9    (a) There is created within the Office of the Attorney 10General an Office for Missing and Murdered Black Women and 11Girls, consisting of Assistant Attorneys General appointed by 12the Attorney General, who, together with such other staff as 13is deemed necessary by the Attorney General, shall:14        (1) serve as the legal and policy advisor to the 15    Attorney General to ensure justice for missing and 16    murdered Black women and girls;17        (2) develop recommendations for policies to address 18    injustices in the criminal justice system's response to 19    cases of missing and murdered Black women and girls; and20        (3) coordinate with State and local agencies to:21            (A) collect data on missing person and homicide 22        cases involving Black women and girls, including the 23        total number of cases, the rate at which the cases are   SB1515- 2 -LRB104 10068 SPS 20139 b1        solved, the length of time the cases remain open, and a 2        comparison to similar cases involving different 3        demographic groups;4            (B) collect data on Amber Alerts, including the 5        total number of Amber Alerts issued, the total number 6        of Amber Alerts that involve Black girls, and the 7        outcome of cases involving Amber Alerts disaggregated 8        by the child's race and sex;9            (C) collect data on reports of missing Black 10        girls, including the number of classified runaways, 11        and a comparison to similar cases involving different 12        demographic groups;13            (D) conduct case reviews and report on the results 14        of such reviews for cases involving missing and 15        murdered Black women and girls, including cold cases 16        for missing Black women and girls and death 17        investigation review for cases of Black women and 18        girls ruled as suicide or overdose under suspicious 19        circumstances;20            (E) develop tools and processes to evaluate the 21        implementation and impact of the efforts of the 22        Office;23            (F) give technical assistance for State and local 24        enforcement agencies during active cases involving 25        missing and murdered Black women and girls; and26            (G) create and maintain a centralized data   SB1515- 3 -LRB104 10068 SPS 20139 b1        repository and public dashboard for the tracking of 2        missing and murdered Black women and girls.3    (b) No later than January 1 after the effective date of 4this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and 5biennially thereafter, the Office shall file with the General 6Assembly, as provided in Section 3.1 of the General Assembly 7Organization Act, a report on missing and murdered Black women 8and girls, including, but not limited to, the information 9collected under paragraph (3) of subsection (a).